Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Chapter 6 Securities Issued by Gas and Electric Corporations

§ 37-6-101.
Right to issue securities and create liens subject to control of commission; purposes enumerated.

The right of every gas corporation and of every electrical corporation operating as a public utility in the state of Wyoming to issue, assume or guarantee securities and to create liens on its property situated within the state of Wyoming is a special privilege, hereby subjected to the supervision and control of the public service commission of the state of Wyoming, as hereinafter in this act [§§

37-6-101

through

37-6-107

] set forth. Such public utility when authorized by order of the commission and not otherwise, may issue stocks and stock certificates and may issue, assume or guarantee other securities payable at periods of more than eighteen (18) months after the date thereof, for the following purposes: for the acquisition of property; for the construction, completion, extension or improvement of its facilities; for the improvement or maintenance of its service; for the discharge or lawful refunding of its obligations; for the reimbursement of monies actually expended for said purposes from income or from other monies in the treasury not secured by or obtained from the issue, assumption or guarantee of securities, within five (5) years next prior to the filing of an application with the commission for the required authorization; or for any other purpose approved by the commission.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 76, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 37-65.

Cross references. —

As to revenue bond power districts, see art. 2 of chapter 7 of this title.

This section and §

37-6-102

do not extend to certification. —

This section and §

37-6-102

apply to the operations of authorized, established, public utilities in instances where the authority of the commission relates only to strictly internal financing, and do not extend to certification or matters in actuality connected therewith. Bridger Valley Elec. Ass'n v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 430 P.2d 919,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Wyo. 1967).

Applied

in

Pacific Power & Light Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 677 P.2d 799,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 259

(Wyo. 1984).

Law reviews. —

For article, “State Jurisdiction over the Regulation of Energy Distribution and Other Public Utility Services,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 535 (1980).

§ 37-6-102.
Application for authorization regarding securities; approval or disapproval.

Such public utility shall, by written petition, filed with the commission and setting forth the pertinent facts involved, make application to the commission for an order authorizing the proposed issue, assumption or guarantee of securities, and the application of the proceeds therefrom for the purposes specified. The commission shall, after such hearing and upon such notice as the commission may prescribe, enter its written order approving the petition and authorizing the proposed securities transactions, unless the commission shall find: that such transactions are inconsistent with the public interest; or that the purpose or purposes thereof are not permitted by this act [§§

37-6-101

through

37-6-107

]; or that the aggregate amount of the securities outstanding and proposed to be outstanding would exceed the fair value of the properties and business of the public utility.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 76, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 37-66.

Section does not extend to certification. —

See note to §

37-6-101

.

Quoted

in

Pacific Power & Light Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 677 P.2d 799,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 259

(Wyo. 1984).

Law reviews. —

For article, “State Jurisdiction over the Regulation of Energy Distribution and Other Public Utility Services,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 535 (1980).

§ 37-6-103.
Securities which may be issued without approval; not to be refunded by stock without approval; securities exempted from chapter.

Such public utility may issue such securities other than stock or stock certificates, payable at periods of not more than eighteen (18) months after date of issuance of the same, and secured or unsecured, without application to or order of the commission, but no such securities so issued shall in whole or in part be refunded by any issue of stocks, stock certificates or other securities having a maturity of more than eighteen (18) months, except on application to and approval of the commission.

The commission may from time to time by order or rule, and subject to such terms and conditions as may be prescribed therein, exempt any security or any class of securities for which an application is required under this chapter or any public utility or class of public utility from the provisions of this chapter if it finds that the application thereof to such security, class of securities, public utility or class of public utility is not required by the public interest.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 76, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 37-67; Laws 1995, ch. 192, § 2.

Law reviews. —

For article, “State Jurisdiction over the Regulation of Energy Distribution and Other Public Utility Services,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 535 (1980).

§ 37-6-104.
Disposal of applications.

All applications for the issuance, assumption or guarantee of securities shall be disposed of promptly, and within thirty (30) days after petition is filed with the commission unless it is necessary, for good cause, to continue same for a longer period. Whenever such application is continued beyond thirty (30) days after the time it is filed the commission shall enter an order making such continuance and stating fully the facts necessitating same.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 76, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 37-68.

§ 37-6-105.
State not obligated to pay or guarantee securities.

No provision of this act [§§

37-6-101

through

37-6-107

], or any act or deed done or performed in connection therewith shall be construed to obligate the state of Wyoming to pay or guarantee in any manner whatsoever any security authorized, issued, assumed or guaranteed under the provisions of this act.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 76, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 37-69.

§ 37-6-106.
Unapproved securities void; exception.

All securities issued, assumed or guaranteed without application to or approval of the commission, provided herein, except the securities mentioned in W.S.

37-6-103

, shall be void.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 76, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 37-70; Laws 1995, ch. 192, § 2.

Quoted

in

Pacific Power & Light Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 677 P.2d 799,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 259

(Wyo. 1984).

Law reviews. —

For article, “State Jurisdiction over the Regulation of Energy Distribution and Other Public Utility Services,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 535 (1980).

§ 37-6-107.
Identification of certificates.

The commission shall provide by serial number or other device to be placed on the face thereof, for the proper and easy identification of such stock, stock certificates, bonds, notes and other evidence of indebtedness as may be issued by a public utility under the provisions of this act [§§

37-6-101

through

37-6-107

].

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 76, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 37-71.